Rhode Island, session 2025, SB186.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-30 of the General Laws entitled "Personal Income Tax" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-30-28. Tax credit for sewer connection cost.
(a) An owner of real property upon which a single family or multi-family dwelling is
located will be allowed an income tax credit for the installation costs of connecting the single or
multi-family dwelling to a municipal sewer system.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the owner of real property shall be allowed a non-
refundable state income tax credit in the amount of the actual cost of connection. This credit shall
be claimed only once by the real property owner.
(c) This income tax credit shall be allowed as either a personal or a corporate income tax
credit, depending on the real property owner's income tax filing status on the last day of the owner's
income tax filing period; provided, that if the installation costs were incurred by a corporation, then
a non-refundable corporate income tax credit shall be allowed, and if installation costs were not
incurred by a corporation, then a non-refundable personal income tax credit shall be allowed.
(d) In no event shall both a corporate and personal non-refundable income tax credit be
allowed for the installation costs at a single location.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000941
========
LC000941 - Page 2 of 3